Utah statutes.
57-19-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1)  "Accommodations" includes hotel or motel rooms, condominium or
cooperative units, cabins, lodges, apartments, and private or commercial
structures designed for occupancy by one or more individuals.
(2)  "Advertisement" means a written, printed, audio, or visual offer made by
general solicitation.
(3)  "Camp resort" means any enterprise that has as its primary purpose the
offering of a camp resort interest.
(4)  "Camp resort interest" means the right to use and occupy a camping site.
(5)  "Camping site" means a space designed or promoted for the purpose of
locating a trailer, tent, tent trailer, pickup camper, or other similar device
used for land-based portable housing.
(6)  "Developer" means a person who establishes, promotes, owns, or operates a
timeshare development or camp resort.
(7)  "Director" means the director of the division.
(8)  "Division" means the Division of Real Estate of the Department of
Commerce.
(9)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of
Commerce.
(10)  "Interest" means a camp resort interest or a timeshare interest.
(11)  "Offer" means a solicitation intended to result in a person purchasing
an interest in a project.
(12)  "Project" means a camp resort or timeshare development.
(13)  "Purchaser" means a person who purchases an interest in a project.
(14)  "Sale" or "sell" means selling an interest in a project for value.  It
does not include charging a reasonable fee to offset the administrative costs
of transferring an interest in a project.
(15)  "Salesperson" means an individual who, for compensation and as agent for
another, is engaged in obtaining commitments of persons to purchase an
interest in a project by making direct sales presentations to those persons.
It does not include purchasers or members engaged in the referral of persons
without making a direct sales presentation to them.
(16)  "Timeshare development" means any enterprise that has as its primary
purpose the offering of a timeshare interest.
(17)  "Timeshare interest" means a right to occupy accommodations during three
or more separate time periods over a period of at least three years, including
renewal options, whether or not coupled with an estate in land. It includes
what is commonly known as a "timeshare estate," which is a small undivided
fractional fee interest in real property by which the purchaser does not
receive any right to use accommodations except as provided by contract,
declaration, or other instrument defining a legal right.
